Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 6. Turning and Starting and Signals on Stopping and Turning

§ 1061.
Turning at intersections.

A driver intending to turn at an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall proceed as follows:

Right turn. Both the approach for a right turn and a right turn shall be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

Left turns on two-way roadways. At any intersection where traffic is permitted to move in both directions on each roadway entering the intersection, an approach for a left turn shall be made in that portion of the right half of the roadway nearest the centerline thereof and by passing to the right of such centerline where it enters the intersection and after entering the intersection the left turn shall be made so as to leave the intersection to the right of the centerline of the roadway being entered. Whenever practicable the left turn shall be made in that portion of the intersection to the left of the center of the intersection.

Left turns on other than two-way roadways. At any intersection where traffic is restricted to one direction on one or more of the roadways, the driver of a vehicle intending to turn left at any such intersection shall approach the intersection in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of such vehicle and after entering the intersection the left turn shall be made so as to leave the intersection, as nearly as practicable, in the left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in such direction upon the roadway being entered.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1062.
Turning prohibited.

No person shall turn a vehicle in order to proceed in the opposite direction on any curve, or upon the approach to or near the crest of a grade, where the vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction for a distance of 500 feet.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1063.
Starting parked vehicles.

No person shall move a vehicle that is stopped, standing, or parked unless the movement can be made with reasonable safety.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1064.
Signals required; general obligation to turn and move safely.

Before changing direction or materially slackening speed, a driver shall give warning of his or her intention with the hand signals as provided in section 1065 of this title, or with a mechanical or lighting device approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. A bicyclist shall give such hand signals unless he or she cannot do so safely.

A person shall not turn a vehicle at an intersection unless the vehicle is in proper position upon the roadway as required in section 1061 of this title, or turn a vehicle to enter an alley, private road, or driveway, or otherwise turn a vehicle from a direct course or move right or left upon a roadway unless such movement can be made with reasonable safety.

A person shall not stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided in this section to the driver of any vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give such signal.

A signal of intention to turn right or left when required shall be given continuously during not less than the last 100 feet traveled by the vehicle before turning. A bicyclist shall comply with this subsection unless he or she cannot do so safely.

The signals provided for in section 1065 of this title shall be used to indicate an intention to turn, change lanes, or start from a parked position and may not be flashed on one side only on a parked or disabled vehicle, or flashed as a courtesy or “do pass” signal to operators of other vehicles approaching from the rear.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 43;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 1065.
Hand signals.

A right or left turn shall not be made without first giving a signal of intention either by hand or by signal in accordance with section 1064 of this title. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all signals to indicate change of speed or direction, when given by hand, shall be given from the left side of the vehicle and in the following manner:

Left turn. — Hand and arm extended horizontally.

Right turn. — Hand and arm extended upward.

Stop or decrease speed. — Hand and arm extended downward.

A person operating a bicycle may give a right-turn signal by extending the right hand and arm horizontally and to the right side of the bicycle.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2009, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 20, 2010.